Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-309
Reorganization; existing ordinances; effect; debts; taxes.

All ordinances of the city shall remain and be in full force in the village until amended or repealed by the board of trustees, and the board shall provide for the payment of the city indebtedness, and levy necessary taxes therefor as if the same had been incurred by the village.

Laws 1879, § 55, p. 206;

R.S.1913, § 5079;

C.S.1922, § 4251;

C.S.1929, § 17-303;

R.S.1943, § 17-309.